apertium-hun.hun.dix
    <!-- van -->
    <pardef n="/van__vbser">
      <e><p><l>lenni</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lehet</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lehet-e</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pot"/>+e<s n="qst"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>volt</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vagyok</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vagy</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>van</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vagyunk</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vagytok</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vannak</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>voltam</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>voltál</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>volt</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>voltunk</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>voltatok</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>voltak</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>volt</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lévő</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>legyen</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>volna</l><r>van<s n="vbser"/><s n="cond"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- lesz -->
    <pardef n="le/sz__vblex">

        <e><p><l>nni</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szek</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szel</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sz</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szünk</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sztek</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sznek</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>szlek</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szed</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szi</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sszük</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sitek</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szik</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ttem</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ttél</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tt</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ttünk</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ttetek</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ttek</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ttem</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tted</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tte</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ttük</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ttétek</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tték</l><r>sz<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      </pardef>

      <!-- kell -->
    <pardef n="kell__vblex">

        <e><p><l>eni</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>esz</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ünk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>etek</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>enek</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>enék</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cond"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>enél</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cond"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ene</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cond"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>enénk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cond"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>enétek</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cond"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>enének</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cond"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ett</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>

      <!-- }}}
           }}}
           {{{ interjections -->

    <pardef n="nem__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- }}} -->

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="megvan"><i>meg</i><par n="/van__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="van"><i></i><par n="/van__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="hisz"><i>hi</i><par n="le/sz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kell"><i>kell</i><par n="kell__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lesz"><i>le</i><par n="le/sz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tesz"><i>te</i><par n="le/sz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vesz"><i>ve</i><par n="le/sz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="visz"><i>vi</i><par n="le/sz__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nem"><i>nem</i><par n="nem__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="igen"><i>igen</i><par n="nem__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nincs"><i>nincs</i><par n="nem__ij"/></e>
